Vermont, session 2025-2026, S258.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. SHORT TITLE
This act may be referred to as the “Super Speeder Accountability Act.”
Sec. 2. 23 V.S.A. § 680 is added to read:
§ 680. INTELLIGENT SPEED ASSISTANCE DEVICES
(a) As used in this section:
VT LEG #385910 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.258
2026 Page 2 of 9
(1) “Intelligent speed assistance certificate” means a restricted privilege
to operate a motor vehicle issued by the Commissioner allowing a nonresident
whose privilege to operate a motor vehicle in Vermont has been suspended or
revoked or who has been convicted of operating a motor vehicle on a public
highway in Vermont at a speed of 100 miles per hour or more to operate a
motor vehicle, other than a commercial motor vehicle as defined in section
4103 of this title, equipped with an approved intelligent speed assistance
device.
(2) “Intelligent speed assistance device” means an aftermarket device
approved by the Commissioner that uses GPS to actively limit a motor
vehicle’s speed to posted or preset speed limits. Intelligent speed assistance
devices do not include any technology or device that is provided by a motor
vehicle manufacturer as a component of a new motor vehicle and can control
or affect the speed of the motor vehicle.
(3) “Intelligent speed assistance restricted operator’s license” or
“intelligent speed assistance ROL” means a restricted license to operate a
motor vehicle issued by the Commissioner allowing a resident whose privilege
to operate a motor vehicle in Vermont has been suspended or revoked or who
has been convicted of operating a motor vehicle on a public highway in
Vermont at a speed of 100 miles per hour or more to operate a motor vehicle,
VT LEG #385910 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.258
2026 Page 3 of 9
other than a commercial motor vehicle as defined in section 4103 of this title,
equipped with an approved intelligent speed assistance device.
(b)(1) An individual whose license or privilege to operate is suspended
pursuant to subdivision 671(a)(2) of this chapter may operate a motor vehicle,
other than a commercial motor vehicle as defined in section 4103 of this title,
during the period of suspension if issued an intelligent speed assistance ROL
or certificate pursuant to the provisions of this section.
(2) An individual whose license or privilege to operate is revoked
pursuant to section 673a of this title for moving violations that include one or
more convictions in the past five years for operating a motor vehicle on a
public highway in this State at a speed that was more than 30 miles per hour
over and in excess of the speed limit may operate a motor vehicle, other than a
commercial motor vehicle as defined in section 4103 of this title, during the
period of revocation if issued an intelligent speed assistance ROL or certificate
pursuant to the provisions of this section.
(3) An individual whose license or privilege to operate is suspended
pursuant to chapter 25 of this title for a period of 90 days or more and who has
been convicted by any court in this State of one or more moving violations
during the past two years in which the individual operated a motor vehicle on a
public highway in this State at a speed that was over and in excess of the speed
limit may operate a motor vehicle, other than a commercial motor vehicle as
VT LEG #385910 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.258
2026 Page 4 of 9
defined in section 4103 of this title, during the period of suspension if issued
an intelligent speed assistance ROL or certificate pursuant to the provisions of
this section.
(c)(1) Upon application by an individual described in subsection (b) of this
section who is otherwise licensed or eligible to be licensed to operate a motor
vehicle, the Commissioner shall issue an intelligent speed assistance ROL or
intelligent speed assistance certificate if the individual submits the following:
(A) a $125.00 application fee; and
(B) satisfactory proof of installation of an approved intelligent speed
assistance device in any motor vehicle to be operated by the individual and of
financial responsibility pursuant to the provisions of section 801 of this title.
(2) An intelligent speed assistance ROL or intelligent speed assistance
certificate shall expire at 12:00 midnight on the eve of the second birthday of
the applicant following the date of issue and may be renewed for one-year
terms. The Commissioner shall send by first-class mail an application for
renewal of the intelligent speed assistance ROL or certificate at least 30 days
prior to the day renewal is required and shall impose the same conditions for
renewal as are required for initial issuance. The renewal fee shall be $125.00.
(d) An individual required to install and use an intelligent speed assistance
device pursuant to subsection (b) of this section shall be responsible for all
costs related to installing, removing, purchasing or leasing, and maintaining the
VT LEG #385910 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.258
2026 Page 5 of 9
intelligent speed assistance device, as well as any costs related to calibrating
the device and retrieving data from it periodically as required by the
Commissioner.
(e) The holder of an intelligent speed assistance ROL or intelligent speed
assistance certificate shall, during the period required by the Commissioner
pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, operate only motor vehicles in which
an intelligent speed assistance device is installed.
(f)(1) The holder of an intelligent speed assistance ROL or intelligent speed
assistance certificate shall not attempt or take any action to tamper with or
otherwise circumvent an intelligent speed assistance device.
(2) A person shall not knowingly and voluntarily tamper with an
intelligent speed assistance device on behalf of another person or otherwise
assist another person in circumventing an intelligent speed assistance device.
A person who violates this subdivision shall be assessed a civil penalty of not
more than $500.00.
(g) Upon receipt of notice that the holder of an intelligent speed assistance
ROL or certificate has been convicted of an offense under this title that would
result in suspension, revocation, or recall of a license or privilege to operate,
the Commissioner shall suspend, revoke, or recall the individual’s intelligent
speed assistance ROL or certificate for the same period that the license or
privilege to operate would have been suspended, revoked, or recalled. The
VT LEG #385910 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.258
2026 Page 6 of 9
Commissioner may impose a reinstatement fee in accordance with section 675
of this title and require, prior to reinstatement, satisfactory proof of installation
of an approved intelligent speed assistance device.
(h)(1)(A) The Commissioner, in consultation with any persons the
Commissioner deems appropriate, shall adopt rules and may enter into
agreements to implement the provisions of this section.
(B) The rules shall establish:
(i) uniform performance standards for intelligent speed assistance
devices, including required levels of accuracy;
(ii) requirements for periodic calibration to ensure accuracy of the
devices;
(iii) the means and frequency of the retrieval and sharing with the
Department of data collected by intelligent speed assistance devices; and
(iv) a schedule of extensions of the period prior to eligibility for
reinstatement for violations of the provisions of this section or the rules
adopted pursuant to this subsection (h).
(2) An individual who holds an intelligent speed assistance ROL or
certificate and violates a rule adopted by the Commissioner pursuant to
subdivision (1) of this subsection or a provision of this section shall, after
notice and an opportunity to be heard, be subject to an extension of the period
prior to eligibility for reinstatement in accordance with the rules adopted by the
VT LEG #385910 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.258
2026 Page 7 of 9
Commissioner pursuant to this subsection. The extension of the period prior to
eligibility for reinstatement shall be in addition to any other penalties imposed
by law.
(3) The Commissioner shall not approve a manufacturer of intelligent
speed assistance devices as a provider in this State unless the manufacturer
agrees to reduce the cost of installing, leasing, and uninstalling the device by at
least 50 percent for persons who furnish proof of receipt of 3SquaresVT,
LIHEAP, or Reach Up benefits or similar benefits in another state.
(i)(1) All individually identifiable information in the custody of a public
agency related to the use of an intelligent speed assistance device shall be
exempt from public inspection and copying under the Public Records Act and
shall not be disclosed except:
(A) pursuant to a warrant;
(B) if a law enforcement officer, in good faith, believes that an
emergency involving danger of death or serious bodily injury to any person
requires access to the information without delay; or
(C) in connection with enforcement proceedings under this section or
rules adopted pursuant to this section.
(2) Information disclosed in violation of this subsection shall be
inadmissible in any judicial or administrative proceeding.
VT LEG #385910 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.258
2026 Page 8 of 9
Sec. 3. 23 V.S.A. § 671 is amended to read:
§ 671. PROCEDURE
(a)(1) In Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection,
in the Commissioner’s discretion, the Commissioner may suspend indefinitely
or for a definite time the license of an operator, or the right of an unlicensed
individual to operate a motor vehicle, after opportunity for a hearing upon not
less than 15 days’ notice, if the Commissioner has reason to believe that the
holder of the license or right to operate is an individual who is incompetent to
operate a motor vehicle or is operating improperly so as to endanger the public.
If, upon receipt of such notice, the individual requests a hearing, the
suspension shall not take effect unless the Commissioner, after hearing,
determines that the suspension is justified. If the Commissioner imposes a
suspension, the Commissioner may order the license delivered to the
Commissioner. Not less than six months from the date of suspension and after
each subsequent six months, an individual upon whom such suspension has
been imposed may apply for reinstatement of the individual’s license or right
to operate or for a new license. Upon receipt of such application, the
Commissioner shall cause an investigation to be made and, if so requested,
conduct a hearing to determine whether such suspension should be continued
in effect.
VT LEG #385910 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.258
2026 Page 9 of 9
(2) The Commissioner shall suspend the license or privilege to operate
of any individual who is convicted of operating a motor vehicle on a public
highway at a speed of 100 miles per hour or more for a period of:
(A) six months for the first conviction;
(B) one year for the second conviction; and
(C) two years for a third or subsequent conviction.
* * *
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385910 v.1